Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.290

Accounting on death, resignation, or revocation of letters.

If any personal representative resign, or his or her letters be revoked, or he or she die, he or she or his or her representatives shall account for, pay, and deliver to his or her successor or to the surviving or remaining personal representatives, all money and property of every kind, and all rights, credits, deeds, evidences of debt, and papers of every kind, of the deceased, at such time and in such manner as the court shall order on final settlement with such personal representative or his or her legal representatives.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2021; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.290. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 78; RRS s 1448; prior: Code 1881 s 1429; 1854 p 273 s 40.]